Massachusetts, session 194th, H4703.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There is hereby imposed a real estate transfer fee equal to 0.5% (half
percent, ½%) of the purchase price upon the transfer of any real property interest in any real
property situated in the Town of Truro. Said fee shall be the liability of the purchaser of such
property interest, and any agreement between the purchaser and the seller or any other person
with reference to the allocation of the responsibility for bearing said fee shall not affect such
liability of the purchaser. The fee shall be paid to the Town of Truro. Fifty percent (50%) of the
funds collected in each fiscal year shall be deposited in the Town’s Capital Improvement
Stabilization Fund and the remaining fifty percent (50%) shall be deposited into the Town’s
Affordable Housing Trust Fund.
SECTION 2. The following transfers of real property interests shall be exempt from the
real estate transfer fee:
of 3

A. First time homebuyers who live in the home for at least 5 years. A lien shall
accompany the deed stating that “There is running with the land a lien equal to the amount of
real estate transfer fee exempted, plus accumulated interest and penalties until such time as all
conditions of this sub-section are met.”
B. Transfers to the government of the U.S., the Commonwealth, the Town of Truro
and any of their instrumentalities, agencies or sub-divisions, such as the Truro Housing
Authority.
C. Transfers made without additional consideration to confirm, correct, modify or
supplement a transfer previously made.
D. Transfers of convenience with consideration under $100 which include: name
change, into trusts, out of trust, etc.
E. Transfers to any charitable organization as defined in Clause 3 of Section 5 of
Chapter 59 of the General Laws or any religious organization providing that the real property
interests so transferred will be held solely for public charitable or religious purposes.
F. Transfers between family members, marriage partners, parents and children,
grandchildren, stepparents and stepchildren, brothers and sisters.
SECTION 3. The fee authorized herein shall be subject to the following:
A. The fee imposed shall be due at the time of the transfer of the real property
interest.
B. The buyer shall pay interest on any unpaid amount of the fee at the rate the Town
collects on unpaid real estate taxes.
of 3

C. The Town shall notify a buyer by registered or certified mail of any failure to
discharge the amount in full of fee due.
D. All fees and interest required to be paid under this Act shall constitute a personal
debt of the buyer and may be recovered in an action of contract.
SECTION 4. The Select Board may enact and from time to time amend regulations to
effectuate the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on passage;
of 3